Utah statutes.
19-6-816.   Limitations on reimbursement.

(1)  The costs reimbursed under this part may not exceed the money in the fund.

(2)  If applications for reimbursement under Section 19-6-809, 19-6-811, or 19-6-812 during any month exceed the money in the fund, the Division of Finance shall prorate the amount of all claims for reimbursement for the month and defer payment of the remainder.

(3)  The amount remaining unpaid on a claim for reimbursement shall be treated as a new application for reimbursement in the next succeeding month until the unpaid amount is $500 or less, at which time the balance of the claim shall be paid in full.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2002 General Session

